Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5227
Affiliate or affiliated, defined.

Affiliate or affiliated shall mean any entity or person who directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, controls or is controlled by, or is under common control with, a specified entity or person.

Laws 1994, LB 1222, § 5.